Illinois, session 104th, HB2943.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Salaries Act is amended by changing Section 51 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 290/1)  (from Ch. 53, par. 1)7    Sec. 1. There shall be allowed and paid an annual salary in 8lieu of all other salaries, fees, perquisites, benefit of 9compensation in any form whatsoever, to each of the officers 10herein named, the following respectively for terms beginning 11before January 9, 2023 and on and after January 11, 2027:12    (1) For terms beginning before January 9, 2023: 13            To the Governor, a salary set by the Compensation 14        Review Board, together with the use and occupancy of 15        the executive mansion.16            To the Lieutenant Governor, a salary set by the 17        Compensation Review Board.18            To the Secretary of State, a salary set by the 19        Compensation Review Board.20            To the Comptroller, a salary set by the 21        Compensation Review Board.22            To the Treasurer, a salary set by the Compensation 23        Review Board.  HB2943- 2 -LRB104 12014 SPS 22109 b1            To the Attorney General, a salary set by the 2        Compensation Review Board.3    (2) For terms beginning on or after January 9, 2023: 4            To the Governor, a salary of $205,700 or as set by 5        the Compensation Review Board, whichever is greater, 6        together with the use and occupancy of the executive 7        mansion.8            To the Lieutenant Governor, a salary of $160,900 9        or as set by the Compensation Review Board, whichever 10        is greater.11            To the Secretary of State, a salary of $183,300 or 12        as set by the Compensation Review Board, whichever is 13        greater.14            To the Comptroller, a salary of $160,900 or as set 15        by the Compensation Review Board, whichever is 16        greater.17            To the Treasurer, a salary of $160,900 or as set by 18        the Compensation Review Board, whichever is greater.19            To the Attorney General, a salary of $183,300 or 20        as set by the Compensation Review Board, whichever is 21        greater. 22(Source: P.A. 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23.) 23    Section 10. The General Assembly Compensation Act is 24amended by changing Section 1 as follows:   HB2943- 3 -LRB104 12014 SPS 22109 b1    (25 ILCS 115/1)  (from Ch. 63, par. 14)2    Sec. 1. Each member of the General Assembly shall receive 3an annual salary of $28,000 or as set by the Compensation 4Review Board, whichever is greater, for terms beginning before 5January 11, 2023 and on and after January 13, 2027. Beginning 6with the 103rd General Assembly, each member of the General 7Assembly shall receive an annual salary of $85,000 or as set by 8the Compensation Review Board, whichever is greater. The 9following named officers, committee chairmen and committee 10minority spokesmen shall receive additional amounts per year 11for their services as such officers, committee chairmen and 12committee minority spokesmen respectively, as set by the 13Compensation Review Board or, as follows, whichever is 14greater: Beginning the second Wednesday in January 1989, the 15Speaker and the minority leader of the House of 16Representatives and the President and the minority leader of 17the Senate, $16,000 each; the majority leader in the House of 18Representatives $13,500; 5 assistant majority leaders and 5 19assistant minority leaders in the Senate, $12,000 each; 6 20assistant majority leaders and 6 assistant minority leaders in 21the House of Representatives, $10,500 each; 2 Deputy Majority 22leaders in the House of Representatives $11,500 each; and 2 23Deputy Minority leaders in the House of Representatives, 24$11,500 each; the majority caucus chairman and minority caucus 25chairman in the Senate, $12,000 each; and beginning the second 26Wednesday in January, 1989, the majority conference chairman   HB2943- 4 -LRB104 12014 SPS 22109 b1and the minority conference chairman in the House of 2Representatives, $10,500 each; beginning the second Wednesday 3in January, 1989, the chairman and minority spokesman of each 4standing committee of the Senate, except the Rules Committee, 5the Committee on Committees, and the Committee on Assignment 6of Bills, $6,000 each; and beginning the second Wednesday in 7January, 1989, the chairman and minority spokesman of each 8standing and select committee of the House of Representatives, 9$6,000 each; and beginning fiscal year 2020, the majority 10leader in the Senate, an amount equal to the majority leader in 11the House. For any General Assembly in which the majority 12party in the House of Representatives has 71 or more elected 13Representatives, the majority party shall have one additional 14majority officer who shall have the title of speaker pro 15tempore and who shall receive an amount equal to the majority 16leader in the House and one majority officer who shall receive 17an amount equal to an assistant majority leader in the House of 18Representatives. For any General Assembly in which the 19majority party in the Senate has 36 or more elected Senators, 20the majority party shall have one additional majority officer 21who shall receive an amount equal to the majority leader in the 22House and one majority officer who shall receive an amount 23equal to an assistant majority leader in the Senate. A member 24who serves in more than one position as an officer, committee 25chairman, or committee minority spokesman shall receive only 26one additional amount based on the position paying the highest   HB2943- 5 -LRB104 12014 SPS 22109 b1additional amount. Prior to the 103rd General Assembly, the 2compensation provided for in this Section to be paid per year 3to members of the General Assembly, including the additional 4sums payable per year to officers of the General Assembly 5shall be paid in 12 equal monthly installments. The first such 6installment is payable on January 31, 1977. All subsequent 7equal monthly installments are payable on the last working day 8of the month. Prior to the 103rd General Assembly, a member who 9has held office any part of a month is entitled to compensation 10for an entire month.11    Beginning with the 103rd General Assembly, the 12compensation provided for in this Section to be paid per year 13to members of the General Assembly, including additional sums 14payable per year to officers of the General Assembly, shall be 15paid bi-monthly. Members who resign before completing the 16entire term in office shall be compensated on a prorated 17basis. Members completing the term of a vacancy shall be 18compensated on a prorated basis. 19    Mileage shall be paid at the rate of 20 cents per mile 20before January 9, 1985, and at the mileage allowance rate in 21effect under regulations promulgated pursuant to 5 U.S.C. 225707(b)(2) beginning January 9, 1985, for the number of actual 23highway miles necessarily and conveniently traveled by the 24most feasible route to be present upon convening of the 25sessions of the General Assembly by such member in each and 26every trip during each session in going to and returning from   HB2943- 6 -LRB104 12014 SPS 22109 b1the seat of government, to be computed by the Comptroller. A 2member traveling by public transportation for such purposes, 3however, shall be paid his actual cost of that transportation 4instead of on the mileage rate if his cost of public 5transportation exceeds the amount to which he would be 6entitled on a mileage basis. No member may be paid, whether on 7a mileage basis or for actual costs of public transportation, 8for more than one such trip for each week the General Assembly 9is actually in session. Each member shall also receive an 10allowance of $36 per day for lodging and meals while in 11attendance at sessions of the General Assembly before January 129, 1985; beginning January 9, 1985, such food and lodging 13allowance shall be equal to the amount per day permitted to be 14deducted for such expenses under the Internal Revenue Code; 15however, beginning May 31, 1995, no allowance for food and 16lodging while in attendance at sessions is authorized for 17periods of time after the last day in May of each calendar 18year, except (i) if the General Assembly is convened in 19special session by either the Governor or the presiding 20officers of both houses, as provided by subsection (b) of 21Section 5 of Article IV of the Illinois Constitution or (ii) if 22the General Assembly is convened to consider bills vetoed, 23item vetoed, reduced, or returned with specific 24recommendations for change by the Governor as provided in 25Section 9 of Article IV of the Illinois Constitution. For 26fiscal year 2011 and for session days in fiscal years 2012,   HB2943- 7 -LRB104 12014 SPS 22109 b12013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, and 2019 only (i) the 2allowance for lodging and meals is $111 per day and (ii) 3mileage for automobile travel shall be reimbursed at a rate of 4$0.39 per mile. 5    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 6contrary, beginning in fiscal year 2012, travel reimbursement 7for General Assembly members on non-session days shall be 8calculated using the guidelines set forth by the Legislative 9Travel Control Board, except that fiscal year 2012, 2013, 102014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, and 2019 mileage reimbursement 11is set at a rate of $0.39 per mile. 12    If a member dies having received only a portion of the 13amount payable as compensation, the unpaid balance shall be 14paid to the surviving spouse of such member, or, if there be 15none, to the estate of such member.16(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 17102-664, eff. 1-1-22; 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23.)